North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116B. Escheats and Abandoned Property.
Article 3. Administration of Abandoned Property. [Repealed]

§ 116B-27.

Recodified as

G.S. 116B-5

by Session Laws 1999-460, s. 3(b), effective January 1, 2000.

§§ 116B-28 through 116B-35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-460, s. 3(a), effective January 1, 2000.

§ 116B-36.

Recodified as

G.S. 116B-6

by Session Laws 1999-460, s. 3(b), effective January 1, 2000.

§ 116B-37.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 116B-7

by Session Laws 1999-460, s. 3(b), effective January 1, 2000.

§§ 116B-38 through 116B-46.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-460, s. 3(a), effective January 1, 2000.

§ 116B-47.

Recodified as

G.S. 116B-8

by Session Laws 1999-460, s. 3(b), effective January 1, 2000.

§§ 116B-48,
116B-49.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-460, s. 3(a), effective January 1, 2000.

§ 116B-50.

Reserved for future codification purposes.